Hawaii, session 2026, HB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that, on August 8, 2023, the historic town of Lahaina suffered a devastating fire.  A confluence of environmental and geographic factors, combined with preparedness and response conditions, enabled the fire to rapidly intensify into an urban conflagration resulting in heavy loss of life, widespread destruction of homes and businesses, and catastrophic impacts on the community. The legislature further finds that, in the aftermath of the Lahaina fire, several independent initiatives were launched to investigate and identify the cause of the fire, identify preventative action to reduce the risk of fires throughout the State, and further reforms to bolster fire preparedness.  One such initiative, the interim working groups established by the house of representatives, identified the need for staff specifically dedicated to wildland fire prevention and proposed the establishment of the office of the state fire marshal to serve as the staff dedicated to such wildland fire prevention. The legislature also finds that, in response to that proposal, Act 209, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, was enacted to establish the office of the state fire marshal, determine the duties and jurisdiction of the state fire marshal, and fund the office, including the salary for one full-time equivalent permanent state fire marshal, for fiscal year 2024-2025. The legislature finds that, subsequent to the regular session of 2024, another initiative, the Lahaina Fire Incident Analysis Report by the Fire Safety Research Institute, independently identified the need for a state-funded organization with the sole responsibility for wildfire readiness, such as a state fire marshal.  The Lahaina Fire Incident Analysis Report also contemplates greater responsibilities for the state fire marshal.  The legislature believes that the compensation for the state fire marshal should be commensurate with the greater responsibilities contemplated in the Lahaina Fire Incident Analysis Report. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to supplement the salary for the state fire marshal. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to supplement the salary of the one full-time equivalent (1.00 FTE) permanent state fire marshal. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of labor and industrial relations for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________